Hawaii statutes.
§560:3-107 Scope of proceedings;
proceedings independent; exception. Unless supervised
administration as described in article III, part 5, is involved:

(1) Each proceeding before the court or registrar is
independent of any other proceeding involving the same estate;

(2) Petitions for formal orders of the court may
combine various requests for relief in a single proceeding if the orders sought
may be finally granted without delay. Except as required for proceedings which
are particularly described by other sections of this article, no petition is
defective because it fails to embrace all matters which might then be the
subject of a final order;

(3) Proceedings for probate of wills or adjudications
of no will may be combined with proceedings for appointment of personal
representatives; and

(4) A proceeding for appointment of a personal
representative is concluded by an order making or declining the appointment. [L
1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next